District of Columbia statutes.
25-765

Advertisement on windows and doors of licensed establishment.

(a)

Advertisements relating to alcoholic beverages shall only be displayed in the window of a licensed establishment if the total area covered by the advertisements does not exceed 25% of the window space.

(b)

Advertisements relating to alcoholic beverages shall not be displayed on the exterior of any window or on the exterior or interior of any door.

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-270, § 2(e)(7), 62 DCR 1866
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-270 substituted “to alcoholic beverages” for “to the prices of alcoholic beverages” in (a).